Utah statutes.
62A-4a-801.    Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Hospital" means a general acute hospital, as that term is defined in Section 26-21-2, that is:

(a)  equipped with an emergency room;

(b)  open 24 hours a day, seven days a week; and

(c)  employs full-time health care professionals who have emergency medical services training.

(2)  "Newborn child" means a child who is approximately 72 hours of age or younger, as determined within a reasonable degree of medical certainty.

